Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program

40.355.
Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program — Funding — Administration.

There is hereby established an Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program and there is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund entitled the indigent veterans’ burial trust fund to provide funds to defray the costs of funeral expenses for indigent veterans in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds both public and private. Moneys deposited in the fund shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs or his or her representative. Any unallocated or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested as provided in KRS 42.500(9), and any income earned from the investments along with the unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall not lapse and shall be deemed a trust and agency account and made available solely for the purposes and benefits of the Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program.

The fund shall be used to defray the costs of funeral expenses for indigent veterans by allocating the funds to pay for the burial or cremation and burial honors of an indigent veteran of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or by allocating the funds to reimburse a veterans’ service organization that paid for the cost of the burial or cremation and burial honors of an indigent veteran of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall oversee the Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program and trust fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 29, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

40.357.
Administrative regulations implementing Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program. These regulations shall be in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall coordinate with the Department of Military Affairs and the veterans’ service organizations to determine the eligibility of an indigent veteran in the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program under administrative regulations to be promulgated by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall coordinate the Indigent Veterans’ Burial Program with the Department of Military Affairs, the veterans’ service organizations, the Kentucky Association of Cemeteries, and the Kentucky Funeral Directors’ Association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 29, § 3, effective July 15, 2008.